District of Columbia statutes.
48-715

Exceptions.

This chapter shall not apply to any cosmetic unless the cosmetic is a drug as defined by § 201 of the Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act [21 U.S.C. § 321 ].

June 13, 1990, D.C. Law 8-137, § 16, 37 DCR 2631
1981 Ed., § 33-1015.
Section 201 of the Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act is codified at 21 U.S.C. § 321.
The reference to “§ 201 of the Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act” was corrected from “§ 321 of the Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act” as it appeared in D.C. Law 8-137.